Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-811
False representation; unlawful employment of minor; exceptions; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any minor to falsely represent to any person mentioned in section 28-808 or 28-809, or to his or her agent, that such minor is eighteen years of age or older with the intent to procure any materials set forth in section 28-808 or with the intent to procure such minor's admission to any motion picture, show, or other presentation as set forth in section 28-809.

(2) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly make a false representation to any person mentioned in section 28-808 or 28-809, or to his or her agent, that he or she is the parent or guardian of any minor or that any minor is eighteen years of age with the intent to procure any material set forth in section 28-808 or with the intent to procure such minor's admission to any motion picture, show, or other presentation as set forth in section 28-809.

(3) It shall be unlawful for any person to hire as an employee a minor whose duties it will be to assist in any manner the sale, delivery, distribution, or exhibition of material declared obscene by sections 28-807 to 28-829, except that this section shall not apply if such minor's parents or legal guardian should consent to such employment by giving the employer a written affidavit prior to the minor's employment.

(4) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 167;

Laws 1988, LB 117, § 4.